Massachusetts, session 194th, H2828.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Section 99A of chapter 41 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020 Official Edition, 
is hereby amended by striking out, in line 4, the word “fifteen” and inserting in place thereof the 
following figure:- 40.